src/scripts/English/lseq.foma
# Copyright (C) 2012  Olga Yakovleva <yakovleva.o.v@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define TranscribeLetterSequence 
a -> ey0 || _ \.#. ,, 
a -> ey1 || _ .#. ,, 
[b|d|p|t|v|z] -> ... iy0 || _ \.#. ,, 
[b|d|p|t|v|z] -> ... iy1 || _ .#. ,, 
c -> s iy0 || _ \.#. ,, 
c -> s iy1 || _ .#. ,, 
e -> iy0 || _ \.#. ,, 
e -> iy1 || _ .#. ,, 
[f|l|m|n|s] -> eh0 ... || _ \.#. ,, 
[f|l|m|n|s] -> eh1 ... || _ .#. ,, 
g -> jh iy0 || _ \.#. ,, 
g -> jh iy1 || _ .#. ,, 
h -> ey0 ch || _ \.#. ,, 
h -> ey1 ch || _ .#. ,, 
i -> ay0 || _ \.#. ,, 
i -> ay1 || _ .#. ,, 
j -> jh ey0 || _ \.#. ,, 
j -> jh ey1 || _ .#. ,, 
k -> k ey0 || _ \.#. ,, 
k -> k ey1 || _ .#. ,, 
o -> ow0 || _ \.#. ,, 
o -> ow1 || _ .#. ,, 
q -> k y uw0 || _ \.#. ,, 
q -> k y uw1 || _ .#. ,, 
r -> aa0 r || _ \.#. ,, 
r -> aa1 r || _ .#. ,, 
u -> y uw0 || _ \.#. ,, 
u -> y uw1 || _ .#. ,, 
w -> d ah1 b ax0 l y uw0 || _ ,, 
x -> eh0 k s || _ \.#. ,, 
x -> eh1 k s || _ .#. ,, 
y -> w ay0 || _ \.#. ,, 
y -> w ay1  || _ .#. ; 

regex 
TranscribeLetterSequence ; 
